Massachusetts, session 194th, H2069.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition,
is hereby amended in section 27F by striking said section and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
“Section 27F: Wages of operators of rented equipment; agreements; penalty; civil action
Section 27F. No agreement of lease, rental or other arrangement, and no order or
requisition under which a truck or any automotive or other vehicle or equipment is to be engaged
in public works by the Commonwealth or by a county, city, town or district, shall be entered into
or given by any public official or public body unless said agreement, order or requisition
contains a stipulation requiring prescribed rates of wages, as determined by the commissioner, to
be paid to the operators of said trucks, vehicles or equipment. Any such agreement, order or
requisition which does not contain said stipulation shall be invalid, and no payment shall be
of 5

made thereunder. Said rates of wages shall be requested of said commissioner by said public
official or public body, and shall be furnished by the commissioner in a schedule containing the
classifications of jobs, and the rate of wages to be paid for each job. Said rates of wages shall
include payments to health and welfare plans, pension plans, or, if no such plan is in effect
between employers and employees, the amount of such payments shall be paid directly to said
operators.
Whoever pays less than said rates of wages, including payments to health and welfare
funds, pension plans or the equivalent in wages, on said works, and whoever accepts for his own
use, or for the use of any other person, as a rebate, gratuity or in any other guise, any part or
portion of said wages or health and welfare funds, pension plans shall have violated this section
and shall be punished or shall be subject to a civil citation or order as provided in section 27C.
An employee claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this section may, 90 days after
the filing of a complaint with the attorney general, or sooner if the attorney general assents in
writing, and within 3 years after the violation, institute and prosecute in his own name and on his
own behalf, or for himself and for others similarly situated, a civil action for injunctive relief, for
any damages incurred, and for any lost wages and other benefits. An employee so aggrieved who
prevails in such an action shall be awarded treble damages, as liquidated damages, for any lost
wages and other benefits and shall also be awarded the costs of the litigation and reasonable
attorneys' fees.”
SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition,
is hereby amended in section 27G by striking said section and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
of 5

“Section 27G: Wages of employees of moving contractors; contracts; injunctive relief;
damages
Section 27G. No contract for the moving of office furniture and fixtures shall be entered
into or given by the commonwealth or by a county, city, town or district unless said contract
contains a stipulation requiring prescribed rates of wages, as determined by the commissioner, to
be paid to the employees of a moving contractor. Any such contract which does not contain said
stipulation shall be invalid, and no payment shall be made thereunder. Said rates of wages shall
be requested of the commissioner by the commonwealth or by a county, city, town or district,
and shall be furnished by the commissioner in a schedule containing the classifications of jobs
and the rate of wages to be paid for each job. Said rates of wages shall include payments to
health and welfare plans, pension plans or, if no such plan is in effect between employers and
employees, the amount of such payments shall be paid directly to said employees.
An employee claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this section may, 90 days after
the filing of a complaint with the attorney general, or sooner if the attorney general assents in
writing, and within 3 years after the violation, institute and prosecute in his own name and on his
own behalf, or for himself and for others similarly situated, a civil action for injunctive relief, for
any damages incurred, and for any lost wages and other benefits. An employee so aggrieved who
prevails in such an action shall be awarded treble damages, as liquidated damages, for any lost
wages and other benefits and shall also be awarded the costs of the litigation and reasonable
attorneys' fees.”
of 5

SECTION 3. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition,
is hereby amended in section 27I by striking said section and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
“Section 27I: Wages of school bus drivers; contracts; injunctive relief; damages
Section 27I. No contract for the transportation of pupils in the Commonwealth shall be
entered into or given by a county, city, town or school district unless said contract contains a
stipulation requiring prescribed rates of wages, as determined by the commissioner, to be paid to
the employees of a motor bus company as defined by Section 7A of Chapter 71 of the
Massachusetts General Laws. Any such contract which does not contain said stipulation shall be
invalid, and no payment shall be made thereunder. Said rates of wages shall be requested of the
commissioner by the Commonwealth or by a county, city, town or school district, and shall be
furnished by the commissioner in a schedule containing the classifications of jobs and the rate of
wages to be paid for each job. Said rates of wages shall include payments to health and welfare
plans, pension plans or, if no such plan is in effect between employers and employees, the
amount of such payments shall be paid directly to said employees.
An employee claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this section may, 90 days after
the filing of a complaint with the attorney general, or sooner if the attorney general assents in
writing, and within 3 years after the violation, institute and prosecute in his own name and on his
own behalf, or for himself and for others similarly situated, a civil action for injunctive relief, for
any damages incurred, and for any lost wages and other benefits. An employee so aggrieved who
prevails in such an action shall be awarded treble damages, as liquidated damages, for any lost
of 5

wages and other benefits and shall also be awarded the costs of the litigation and reasonable
attorneys' fees.”
of 5